Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 657.462 is amended to read:
657.462. (1)(a) The Director of the  Employment Department or the director’s authorized repre-
sentative shall, for each calendar year,  compute a benefit ratio for each employer who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b)(A) For an employer whose record has been chargeable with benefits throughout the 12 pre-
ceding calendar quarters ending on the computation date, the benefit  ratio shall be a quotient ob-
tained by dividing the total benefit charges to the employer’s record in the  12 calendar quarters by
the total of the employer’s taxable payrolls for the same 12 calendar quarters.
(B) For an employer whose record has been chargeable with benefits  for at least four or more
consecutive calendar quarters but  less than 12 consecutive calendar quarters and ending on the
computation date, the benefit ratio shall be the quotient  obtained by dividing the total benefits
charged to the employer’s record for the  consecutive calendar quarters by the total of the
employer’s taxable payrolls for the same period.
(C) Benefit ratios shall be carried out to the sixth decimal place.
(2)(a) A [ listing] list shall  be prepared of all employers meeting the requirements of this section
[and whose account is ] whose accounts  are  open according to Employment Department records as
of August 31 following the computation date.
(b) [ This listing shall  start with ] Employers shall be listed in ascending order from  the em-
ployer having the lowest benefit ratio [ and progress through ] to the employer  having the highest
benefit ratio.
(c) The [ listing] list shall show for each employer:
[(a)] (A) The benefit ratio;
[(b)] (B) The employer’s taxable payroll for the four  calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date; and
[(c)] (C) A cumulative total  consisting of the sum of the employer’s taxable payroll and the
taxable payroll of all other preceding employers on the list.
(3)(a) The department shall group all employers in accordance  with the cumulative taxable
payroll percentage limits for the schedule in effect under Table A.
(b)(A) All employers who  fall within the same group [ will] shall  be assigned the tax rate for
that group.
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 1
(B) [ However,] Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph,  if the  grouping results
in the taxable payroll of an employer falling in two groups,  the employer and any other employer
with the same benefit ratio shall be assigned the lower of the two applicable rates.
(c) Fractions of a cent [ will] shall be dropped in computing taxable payroll limits used in Table
A.
(d) The schedule in effect shall be  in accordance with the Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratios
set forth in Table A.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
TABLE A
(Taxable Payroll referred to is the total for all the eligible firms for the four calendar  quarters
preceding and ending on the computation date)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio I
 190% and Over
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
0.5% 0.00% but less than 10.00%
0.6% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
0.7% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
0.8% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
0.9% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
1.0% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
1.1% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
1.2% 40.00% but less than 45.00%
1.3% 45.00% but less than 50.00%
1.4% 50.00% but less than 55.00%
1.5% 55.00% but less than 60.00%
1.6% 60.00% but less than 65.00%
1.7% 65.00% but less than 69.00%
1.8% 69.00% but less than 73.00%
1.9% 73.00% but less than 77.00%
2.0% 77.00% but less than 80.00%
2.1% 80.00% but less than 83.00%
2.2% 83.00% but less than 86.00%
2.3% 86.00% but less than 89.00%
2.4% 89.00% but less than 91.00%
2.5% 91.00% but less than 93.00%
2.6% 93.00% but less than 95.00%
2.7% 95.00% but less than 96.00%
2.8% 96.00% but less than 96.90%
2.9% 96.90% but less than 97.70%
3.0% 97.70% but less than 98.40%
3.1% 98.40% but less than 98.90%
3.2% 98.90% but less than 99.30%
3.4% 99.30% but less than 99.54%
3.6% 99.54% but less than 99.63%
3.8% 99.63% but less than 99.71%
4.0% 99.71% but less than 99.78%
4.2% 99.78% but less than 99.84%
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 2
4.4% 99.84% but less than 99.89%
4.6% 99.89% but less than 99.93%
4.8% 99.93% but less than 99.96%
5.0% 99.96% but less than 99.98%
5.2% 99.98% but less than 99.99%
5.4% 99.99% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio II
 170.00% but less than 190%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
0.7% 0.00% but less than 10.00%
0.8% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
0.9% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.0% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
1.1% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
1.2% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
1.3% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
1.4% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
1.5% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
1.6% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
1.7% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
1.8% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
1.9% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.0% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
2.1% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
2.2% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
2.3% 76.00% but less than 79.00%
2.4% 79.00% but less than 82.00%
2.5% 82.00% but less than 85.00%
2.6% 85.00% but less than 88.00%
2.7% 88.00% but less than 90.00%
2.8% 90.00% but less than 92.00%
2.9% 92.00% but less than 93.50%
3.0% 93.50% but less than 94.90%
3.1% 94.90% but less than 96.20%
3.2% 96.20% but less than 97.40%
3.4% 97.40% but less than 98.54%
3.6% 98.54% but less than 99.54%
3.8% 99.54% but less than 99.63%
4.0% 99.63% but less than 99.71%
4.2% 99.71% but less than 99.78%
4.4% 99.78% but less than 99.84%
4.6% 99.84% but less than 99.89%
4.8% 99.89% but less than 99.93%
5.0% 99.93% but less than 99.96%
5.2% 99.96% but less than 99.98%
5.4% 99.98% to 100.00%
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 3
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio III
 145.00% but less than 170%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
0.9% 0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.0% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
1.1% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.2% 20.00% but less than 24.00%
1.3% 24.00% but less than 28.00%
1.4% 28.00% but less than 32.00%
1.5% 32.00% but less than 36.00%
1.6% 36.00% but less than 40.00%
1.7% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
1.8% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
1.9% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.0% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.1% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
2.2% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.3% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
2.4% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
2.5% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
2.6% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
2.7% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
2.8% 84.00% but less than 87.00%
2.9% 87.00% but less than 90.00%
3.0% 90.00% but less than 93.00%
3.1% 93.00% but less than 95.00%
3.2% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
3.4% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
3.6% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
3.8% 99.00% but less than 99.43%
4.0% 99.43% but less than 99.63%
4.2% 99.63% but less than 99.72%
4.4% 99.72% but less than 99.79%
4.6% 99.79% but less than 99.85%
4.8% 99.85% but less than 99.90%
5.0% 99.90% but less than 99.94%
5.2% 99.94% but less than 99.97%
5.4% 99.97% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio IV
 125.00% but less than 145%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 4
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
1.2%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.3% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
1.4% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.5% 20.00% but less than 24.00%
1.6% 24.00% but less than 28.00%
1.7% 28.00% but less than 32.00%
1.8% 32.00% but less than 36.00%
1.9% 36.00% but less than 40.00%
2.0% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
2.1% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
2.2% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.3% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.4% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
2.5% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.6% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
2.7% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
2.8% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
2.9% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.0% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.1% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.2% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.3% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
3.4% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
3.6% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
3.8% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.0% 99.00% but less than 99.40%
4.2% 99.40% but less than 99.60%
4.4% 99.60% but less than 99.70%
4.6% 99.70% but less than 99.78%
4.8% 99.78% but less than 99.85%
5.0% 99.85% but less than 99.91%
5.2% 99.91% but less than 99.96%
5.4% 99.96% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio V
 110.00% but less than 125%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
1.5%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.6% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
1.7% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.8% 20.00% but less than 24.00%
1.9% 24.00% but less than 28.00%
2.0% 28.00% but less than 32.00%
2.1% 32.00% but less than 36.00%
2.2% 36.00% but less than 40.00%
2.3% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 5
2.4% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
2.5% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.6% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.7% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
2.8% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.9% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
3.0% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
3.1% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
3.2% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.3% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.4% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.5% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.6% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
3.7% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
3.8% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
3.9% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.0% 99.00% but less than 99.40%
4.2% 99.40% but less than 99.60%
4.4% 99.60% but less than 99.70%
4.6% 99.70% but less than 99.78%
4.8% 99.78% but less than 99.85%
5.0% 99.85% but less than 99.91%
5.2% 99.91% but less than 99.96%
5.4% 99.96% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio VI
 100.00% but less than 110%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
1.8%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.9% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
2.0% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
2.1% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
2.2% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
2.3% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
2.4% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
2.5% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
2.6% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
2.7% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.8% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.9% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
3.0% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
3.1% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
3.2% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
3.3% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
3.4% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.5% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.6% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 6
3.7% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.8% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
3.9% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
4.0% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
4.2% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.4% 99.00% but less than 99.50%
4.6% 99.50% but less than 99.70%
4.8% 99.70% but less than 99.79%
5.0% 99.79% but less than 99.87%
5.2% 99.87% but less than 99.94%
5.4% 99.94% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio VII
 90.00% but less than 100%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
2.0%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
2.1% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
2.2% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
2.3% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
2.4% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
2.5% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
2.6% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
2.7% 40.00% but less than 45.00%
2.8% 45.00% but less than 50.00%
2.9% 50.00% but less than 55.00%
3.0% 55.00% but less than 60.00%
3.1% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
3.2% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
3.3% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
3.4% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
3.5% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.6% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.7% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.8% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.9% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
4.0% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
4.2% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
4.4% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.6% 99.00% but less than 99.50%
4.8% 99.50% but less than 99.70%
5.0% 99.70% but less than 99.84%
5.2% 99.84% but less than 99.93%
5.4% 99.93% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 7
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio VIII
Under 90%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
2.2%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
2.3% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
2.4% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
2.5% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
2.6% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
2.7% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
2.8% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
2.9% 40.00% but less than 45.00%
3.0% 45.00% but less than 50.00%
3.1% 50.00% but less than 55.00%
3.2% 55.00% but less than 60.00%
3.3% 60.00% but less than 65.00%
3.4% 65.00% but less than 70.00%
3.5% 70.00% but less than 75.00%
3.6% 75.00% but less than 80.00%
3.7% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.8% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.9% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
4.0% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
4.2% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
4.4% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
4.6% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.8% 99.00% but less than 99.50%
5.0% 99.50% but less than 99.80%
5.2% 99.80% but less than 99.92%
5.4% 99.92% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) Except as provided in subsection (6)(c) of this section:
(a) For each calendar quarter, of each rate determined under  Table A, one hundred and
nine one-thousandths of a percentage point of the rate shall be used  to determine an amount
of the wages subject to tax under this chapter for that calendar quarter  to be disposed of in
accordance with this subsection.
(b) After withholding the actual shared  costs of the department in collecting the amount
of wages determined under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director or the director’s
authorized representative shall pay the amount  of wages into the Supplemental Employment
Department Administration Fund established under ORS 657.783.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6)(c) of this section:
(a) For the first calendar quarter of each odd-numbered year, in addition to the rate de-
termined under subsection (4) of this section, of  each rate determined under Table A, three
one-hundredths of a percentage point of the rate shall be used to determine  an amount of
the wages subject to tax under this  chapter for that calendar quarter to be disposed of in
accordance with this subsection.
(b) After withholding the actual shared  costs of the department in collecting the amount
of wages determined under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director or the director’s
authorized representative shall pay the amount of wages into the  Wage Security Fund es-
tablished under ORS 652.409.
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 8
(c) Except as provided in subsection  (4) of this section, moneys due pursuant to this
section but not received by the department for payment to the  Wage Security Fund by June
30 of each odd-numbered year shall be  paid into the Unemployment Compensation Trust
Fund created under ORS 657.805.
(6)(a) All amounts of wages determined for disposition  under subsections (4) and (5) of
this section shall be paid and  collected in the same manner and at the same time as unem-
ployment compensation taxes under this chapter, unless the director prescribes otherwise.
(b) In  no case shall the rates imposed on wages under subsections (4) and (5) of this
section cause the total rate imposed on the  wages under this section to exceed the rate de-
termined under Table A for any employer.
(c) Subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to the wages  of employers whose
assigned tax rate is 5.4 percent.
SECTION 2.  ORS 652.409 is amended to read:
652.409. (1) The Wage Security Fund is established separate and distinct from  the General Fund.
After [ deduction of the amounts provided  in ORS 657.439 (2)(a) ] withholding the actual shared
costs of the Employment Department under ORS 657.462 (5)(b) , all [ moneys] amounts received
by the [ Employment Department ] department pursuant  to ORS [ 657.439 (2)(a)] 657.462 (5)(a) shall
be paid into  the State Treasury and credited to the Wage Security Fund. All income earned on
moneys in the Wage Security Fund invested by the State Treasurer shall accrue to the fund.
(2) All income  earned on moneys in the Wage Security Fund, and all other moneys in the fund,
are appropriated continuously to the Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries primarily
to carry out the provisions of ORS 652.414. Moneys in the fund may also be  used, within the divi-
sions of the Bureau of Labor and Industries that enforce  wage and hour laws and state laws con-
cerning civil rights, to investigate and enforce claims of  underpaid and unpaid wages under this
chapter and ORS chapter 653  and to investigate conduct that may constitute an unlawful practice
under ORS chapter 659A.
SECTION 3.  ORS 657.783 is amended to read:
657.783. (1) There is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Supplemental Employment Department Administration Fund. The Supplemental Employ-
ment Department Administration Fund shall consist of moneys collected or received  by the Em-
ployment Department pursuant to [ section 3,  chapter 449, Oregon Laws 1987, and ORS 657.439 and
657.463] ORS 657.462.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, all income earned on moneys in the
Supplemental Employment Department Administration Fund invested by  the State Treasurer shall
accrue to the fund. Any balance in the fund shall not lapse at any time. All moneys in the fund are
appropriated continuously to the department for the payment of  expenses of administration of this
chapter  for  which federal funding has been reduced, eliminated or otherwise is not available, and
which has been authorized in the legislatively approved budget of the department.
(3) As determined on June 30  of each odd-numbered year, moneys in the Supplemental Employ-
ment Department  Administration Fund that are in excess of 150 percent of the amount collected
pursuant to ORS [ 657.463 (2)] 657.462 (4) for the first quarter of the previous even-numbered year
shall be transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund. The transfer required by  this
subsection shall be made by December 31 of the odd-numbered year.
SECTION 4.
ORS 657.439 and 657.463 are repealed.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 652.409, 657.462 and 657.783 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2024 Act and the repeal of  ORS 657.439 and 657.463 by section 4 of this 2024 Act apply to
calendar quarters beginning on or after January 1, 2024.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 9
Passed by House February 19, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4035 (HB 4035-INTRO) Page 10